California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
-------------------------------------------

2507.

The officer accepting negotiable paper may deposit it daily with a bank for collection and receive from the bank cashier’s checks in an amount equal to the total deposits. The cashier’s checks shall be deposited in the county treasury like cash received for the same purpose. The officer accepting negotiable paper may at his option deposit such negotiable paper daily in the county treasury instead of in a bank; and the county treasurer shall handle such negotiable paper like any other negotiable paper accepted by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1033.)
-------------------------------------------

2508.

If any negotiable paper is returned unpaid to the bank with which it was deposited pursuant to any requirement of this division, the bank shall return it to the officer who deposited it and, if its amount has been included in any cashier’s check given by the bank, the bank is entitled to a refund in the amount of the unpaid negotiable paper. Any negotiable paper redeemed by or charged back to the county treasurer by reason of nonpayment shall be returned to the officer who deposited it in exchange for currency or other negotiable paper or for the warrant of the county auditor drawn on the fund into which the original deposit was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 180.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2509.

If any negotiable paper is not paid on due presentment for any reason, any record of payment made on any official record because of its acceptance shall be canceled, and the tax or assessment is a lien as though no payment has been attempted.

The officer accepting negotiable paper shall make any memoranda necessary to enable him to make proper cancellation on its return without payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

2509.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after the return to the depositing county officer of any unpaid negotiable paper, the tax collector may charge the person who attempted payment through the unpaid negotiable paper a fee not to exceed the cost of making required notifications to the person, processing the returned unpaid negotiable paper, and making the required cancellations on the tax roll. The fee amount shall be set by the board of supervisors and be subject to the fee review procedures required by Section 54986 of the Government Code. The fee may be added to the tax bill and collected in the same manner as costs recovered under Section 2621.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 126, Sec. 17.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

2510.

When a cancellation is made, the officer making it shall record it on the record where the notation of payment was made. He shall immediately send a notice to the person who attempted payment by the negotiable paper of the cancellation of the payment.

The validity of any tax, assessment, or penalty is not affected by failure or irregularity in giving the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

2511.

By resolution of the board of supervisors passed by a four-fifths vote, any county warrant for a particular fiscal year may be received in payment of taxes for the same fiscal year levied by the county issuing the warrants if the amount of the warrant does not exceed the amount of taxes being paid. If registered, warrants shall be received only in the order of registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2511.1.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Credit card” means any card, plate, coupon book, or other credit device existing for the purpose of being used from time to time upon presentation to obtain money, property, labor, or services on credit.

(2) “Card issuer” means any person who issues a credit card and purchases credit card drafts, or the agent for those purposes with respect to a credit card.

(3) “Cardholder” means any person to whom a credit card is issued or any person who has agreed with the card issuer to pay obligations arising from the issuance of a credit card to another person.

(4) “Draft purchaser” means any person who purchases credit card drafts.

(b) The board of supervisors may authorize the acceptance of a credit card for payment of property taxes. Following an authorization pursuant to the preceding sentence, the county shall, upon approval of the board of supervisors, execute a contract with one or more credit card issuers or draft purchasers. The contract shall provide for all of the following:

(1) The respective rights and duties of the county, and card issuers and draft purchasers regarding the presentment, acceptability, and payment of credit card drafts.

(2) The establishment of a reasonable means by which to facilitate payment settlements.

(3) The payment to the card issuer or draft purchaser of a reasonable fee or discount.

(4) Other matters appropriately included in contracts with respect to the purchase of credit card drafts as may be agreed upon by the parties to the contract.

(c) The honoring of a credit card pursuant to subdivision (b) shall constitute payment of the tax as of the date the credit card is honored, provided the credit card draft is paid following its due presentment to a card issuer or draft purchaser.

(d) The county may impose a fee for the use of a credit card sufficient in amount to provide for the recovery of fees or discounts paid by the county under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and all other costs incurred by the county in providing for payment by credit. Fees imposed under this subdivision shall be approved by the board of supervisors.

(e) If any credit card draft is not paid following due presentment to a card issuer or draft purchaser or is charged back to the county for any reason, any record of payment made shall be null and void. Any receipt issued in acknowledgment of payment shall also be null and void. The obligation of the cardholder shall continue as an outstanding obligation as though no payment had been attempted.

(f) Upon notice of nonpayment of the credit card draft, the tax collector may charge the person who attempted the payment a fee not to exceed the costs of processing the draft, providing notice of nonpayment to that person, and making required cancellations on the tax roll. The amount of the fee shall be set by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 54986 of the Government Code, and may be added to the tax bill and collected in the same manner as costs recovered pursuant to Section 2621. Fees imposed under this subdivision shall be approved by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 497, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2512.

(a) If a remittance to cover a payment required by law to be made to a taxing agency prior to a specified date and hour is (a) deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed with the required postage prepaid, or (b) deposited for shipment with an independent delivery service that is an Internal Revenue Service designated delivery service or has been approved by the tax collector, in a sealed envelope or package, properly addressed with the required fee prepaid, delivery of which shall not be later than 5 p.m. on the next business day after the effective delinquent date, the remittance shall be deemed received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon the envelope containing the remittance, or
 the independent delivery service shipment date shown on the packing slip or air bill attached to the outside of the envelope or package containing the remittance, or, in the absence of any of the aforementioned dates, on the date received by the county treasurer-tax collector, or on the date it was mailed if proof satisfactory to the tax collector establishes that the mailing occurred on an earlier date. The taxing agency is not required to accept a payment actually received in the mail if it is received more than 30 days after the date and time set by law for the payment.

(b) If a remittance to cover a payment, required by law to be made to a taxing agency prior to a specified date and hour, is made by an electronic payment option, such as wire transfer, telephoned credit card, or electronic internet means, the remittance shall be deemed
 received on the date the transaction was completed by the taxpayer, if the remittance was made on the taxing agency’s authorized internet website or via the taxing agency’s authorized telephone number. Proof of completion of the transaction in the form of a confirmation number or other convincing evidence shall be presented by the taxpayer to the satisfaction of the tax collector. This subdivision does not apply to payments by electronic fund transfer as provided in Sections 2503.1 and 2503.2.

(c) This section does not, for purposes of applying subdivision (a) of Section 3707, apply to a remittance sent by mail, by independent delivery service, or by electronic payment option for the redemption of tax-defaulted property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 462, Sec. 1.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2513.

If an application, tax statement or claim for credit or refund required by law to be filed with a taxing agency on or before a specified date is filed with the taxing agency through the United States mail, properly addressed with the required postage prepaid, it shall be deemed filed on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped on the envelope containing it, or on the date it was mailed if proof satisfactory to the tax collector establishes that the mailing occurred on an earlier date.

If an application, tax statement or claim for credit or refund required by law to be filed with the taxing agency on or before a specified time on a specified date is sent through the United States mail, properly addressed with the required postage prepaid, and the cancellation mark is placed on the envelope after it is deposited in the mail:

(a) Where the cancellation mark shows both date and time, the application, tax statement or claim for credit or refund shall be deemed filed on the date shown by the cancellation mark and by the time specified by law for that date.

(b) Where the cancellation mark shows only the date, the application, tax statement or claim for credit or refund shall be deemed filed within the time and date specified when the cancellation mark bears a date on or before the specified date of filing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

2514.

(a) Upon receipt of the payment by the Controller described in Section 20602, 20630, 20639.6, or 20640.6, the following shall occur:

(1) The tax collector shall maintain a record of the fact that taxes on the property have been postponed. In the case of the secured roll, this information may be entered in that portion of the roll which has been designated for tax default information as required by Section 3439.

(2) With respect to a claimant whose property taxes are paid by a lender from an impound, trust, or other type of account described in Section 2954 of the Civil Code, the tax collector shall notify the auditor of the claimant’s name and address, and the duplicate amount of money the Controller
 paid to the tax collector.

The county auditor, treasurer, or disbursing officer shall refund the amount of money, based on the payment by the Controller, to the claimant within 60 days of the replicated payment.

(b) The procedures established by this chapter shall not be construed to require a lender to alter the manner in which a lender makes payment of the property taxes of such a claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 9.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2515.

(a) Upon receiving a copy of the “notice of lien for postponed property taxes” from the Controller, the assessor shall maintain a record of the fact that the taxes on the property have been postponed and the Controller’s identification number and shall, if such record reveals a change in the ownership status of the property subsequent to the date of entry of the postponement information thereon, notify the Controller within 60 days of processing the change in the ownership status in the manner prescribed by the Controller.

(b) From the time of recordation of the notice of lien pursuant to Section 16182 of the Government Code, the lien for postponed property taxes shall be deemed to impart constructive notice of the contents thereof to subsequent purchasers,
 mortgagees, lessees, and other lienors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 19.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2516.

Upon the failure of a transferee to file a change in ownership statement required by Section 480, the assessor or the auditor shall immediately enter on the assessment records applicable to the real property, the fact that a penalty has been added to the assessment roll and specify the date and amount thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Collection Generally [2601. - 2636.]

2601.

(a) On or before the fourth Monday in September, the auditor shall deliver the secured roll to the tax collector, with an affixed affidavit, subscribed by him, as follows:

“I, ____, Auditor of ____ County, swear that I received the assessment roll from the assessor, with his affixed affidavit: that I have corrected it as required by the State Board of Equalization; and that I have reckoned the respective sums due as taxes and have added the columns of valuations and taxes, as required by law.”

If the roll is a machine-prepared roll, the auditor shall deliver
 the assessment roll to the assessor and shall deliver the roll on which he has extended taxes to the tax collector, with an affixed affidavit, subscribed by him, as follows:

“I, ____, Auditor of ____ County, swear that the attached roll is a reproduction of the roll prepared by the assessor and corrected by the State Board of Equalization; and that I have reckoned the respective sums due as taxes and have added the columns of valuations and taxes as required by law.”

(b) If the roll is a machine-prepared roll, and the tax bills are, with the consent of the tax collector and the approval of the board of supervisors, also machine-prepared by the auditor, the auditor shall, on or before the fourth Monday in September, deliver the assessment roll to the assessor, and shall, on or before October 16, deliver the roll on which he has extended taxes to the tax collector, with an affixed affidavit,
 subscribed by him, as follows:

“I, ____, Auditor of ____ County, swear that the attached roll is a reproduction of the roll prepared by the assessor and corrected by the State Board of Equalization; and that I have reckoned the respective sums due as taxes and have added the columns of valuations and taxes as required by law.”

(c) If the extended roll is retained in electronic data-processing equipment and no physical document is prepared and if the tax bills are, with the consent of the tax collector and the approval of the board of supervisors, machine prepared, the auditor shall, on or before the fourth Monday in September, deliver the assessment roll to the assessor, and shall, on or before October 16, deliver the completed tax bills to the tax collector with an affidavit, subscribed by him, as follows:

“I, ____, Auditor of ____ County,
 swear that the tax bills herewith submitted to you are the result of extending the roll prepared by the assessor and corrected by the State Board of Equalization and that I have determined the respective sums due as taxes, in the total amount of $____, as required by law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1384.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

The tax collector shall collect all property taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 166.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

At the time the auditor delivers the local assessment roll to the tax collector, he shall charge the collector with the taxes extended thereon, together with the taxes extended on the board roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 261, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

2604.

When property the taxes on which are to be collected by the tax collector is placed on the roll after it has been delivered to the tax collector, the auditor shall immediately compute and enter the tax and other charges and make the necessary changes in his account with the tax collector.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2605.

The following taxes on the secured roll are due and payable November 1:

(a) All taxes on personal property.

(b) Half the taxes on real property, and if the amount is not evenly divisible by two, the odd cent is also due and payable unless the roll shows the odd cent as part of the second installment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 546, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2606.

The second half of taxes on real property on the secured roll is due and payable February 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 546, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2607.

The entire tax on real property may be paid when the first installment is due and payable or at any time thereafter until the properties on the current roll become tax defaulted. The second installment may be paid separately only if the first installment has been paid. The tax collector shall accept payment of current year taxes even though prior year delinquencies on the real property may exist. The acceptance of that payment shall not affect the validity of any sale in satisfaction of a lien for defaulted taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 546, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2607.1.

Upon authorization of the board of supervisors, the tax collector shall accept payment of the second installment of the tax on real property at a discounted amount, as established annually by the board, if payment is made on or before the date the first installment is due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 534, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2608.

The tax collector may fix a date preceding the due date when payments may be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2609.

On or before November 1 of each year, the tax collector shall publish a notice specifying:

(a) The dates when taxes on the secured roll will be due.

(b) The times when these taxes will be delinquent.

(c) The penalties and costs for delinquency.

(d) That all taxes may be paid when the first installment is due.

(e) The times and places at which payment of taxes may be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 454, Sec. 8.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2610.

The notice shall be published once a week for two weeks in a newspaper, if there is one published in the county, or, if none, by posting it in three public places in each township.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2610.5.

Annually, on or before November 1, the tax collector shall mail or electronically transmit a county tax bill or a copy thereof for every property on the secured roll. This requirement need not be met where no taxes are due. Failure to receive a tax bill shall not relieve the lien of taxes, nor shall it prevent the imposition of penalties imposed by this code. However, the penalty imposed for delinquent taxes as provided by any section of this code shall be canceled if the assessee or fee owner demonstrates to the tax collector that delinquency is due to the tax
 collector’s failure to mail or electronically transmit the tax bill to the address provided on the tax roll or electronic address provided and authorized by the taxpayer to the tax collector. Penalties imposed may be canceled if the board of supervisors, upon recommendation of the tax collector, has authorized the tax collector to establish, and the tax collector has so established, specific procedures for the consideration of penalty cancellations. Those procedures may provide that penalties imposed may be canceled by resolution of the county board of supervisors upon the recommendation of the tax collector if the assessees or fee owners demonstrate to the tax collector that the delinquency is due to the county’s failure to send a notice of taxes to the owner of property acquired after the lien date on the secured roll, provided payment of the amount of taxes due, minus any penalties and costs, is made no later than June 30 of the fiscal year in which the property owner is named as the assessee for taxes
 coming due.

With respect to a late, amended, or corrected tax bill, the penalties imposed for delinquent taxes shall be canceled if the tax amount is paid within 30 days following the date that bill is mailed or electronically transmitted.

Under no circumstance shall a taxpayer have fewer than 30 days to pay without penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 941, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2610.6.

When the tax collector sends a tax bill to any person respecting property which has been assessed to another and who has the power, pursuant to written or oral authorization, to pay the taxes on behalf of another, the tax collector shall send to the assessee an information copy of the tax bill, except, that the copy shall state plainly that the copy is not a bill and that the original bill has been sent to another person for payment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2770 by Stats. 1988, Ch. 830, Sec. 8.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.

A notice shall be printed on all tax bills specifying that if taxes are unpaid, it will be necessary as provided by law to pay:

(a) Delinquency penalties.

(b) Costs.

(c) Redemption penalties.

(d) Redemption fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 247.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.1.

Any county department, officer, or employee charged by law with the collection of any county tax assessment, penalty or cost, license fees or money owing the county for any reason, that is due and payable, may file a verified application with the board of supervisors for a discharge from accountability for the collection of the tax assessment, penalty or cost, license fees or money owing the county for any reason in accordance
 with Sections 25257, 25258, 25259, and 25259.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 352, Sec. 3.   (SB 948)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.2.

The application for a discharge of accountability shall include:

(a) A statement of the nature of the amount owing.

(b) The names of the assessees or persons liable and the amount owed by each. 

(c) The estimated cost of collection.

(d) Any other fact warranting the discharge, except where the board of supervisors determines that the circumstances do not warrant the furnishing of detailed information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1360.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.3.

The board of supervisors may make an order discharging the department, officer, or employee, from further accountability and direct the county auditor to adjust any charge against said department, officer, or employee, in a like amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1360.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.4.

Any county department, officer or employee may refrain from collecting any tax, assessment, penalty or cost, license fees or money owing to the county where the amount to be collected is twenty dollars ($20) or less. Nothing in this section shall be construed as releasing any person from the payment of any tax, assessment, penalty or cost, license fee or any other money which is due and owing to the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.5.

(a) At the option of a county and when authorized by resolution of the board of supervisors pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 29370) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code, a cash difference fund may be used to increase the amount tendered to the county for the payment of any tax, assessments, penalty, cost, or interest that is due and owing the county, when a difference of twenty dollars ($20) or less exists. A record of each use of the fund shall be maintained, containing sufficient information to identify the name of the person whose account was credited and listing the amount of the difference.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law, including Sections 29372, 29373, 29374, and 29375
 of the Government Code, the cash difference fund may be expended, maintained, or replenished by accounting entries into a cash difference account and an overage account maintained in the county automated accounting system. All transfers between the fund and the accounts may be made and retained in electronic data processing equipment and no written report pursuant to Section 29373 of the Government Code, warrant, special warrant, or check warrant need be prepared by the auditor or treasurer. If approved pursuant to Section 29380.1 of the Government Code, replenishment of the cash difference account may be accomplished by the county auditor by a journal entry or electronic funds transfer from the county’s general fund.

(c) When an amount paid to the county on any tax, assessment, penalty, cost, and interest exceed the amount due the county and the excess does not exceed twenty dollars ($20), the excess amount may be deposited into the overage
 account. If the excess amount is not so deposited, it shall be refunded to the person making the payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 258, Sec. 2.   (SB 789)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.6.

The following information shall be included in each county tax bill, whether mailed or electronically transmitted, or in a separate statement accompanying the bill:

(a) The full value of locally assessed property, including assessments made for irrigation district purposes in accordance with Section 26625.1 of the Water Code.

(b) The tax rate required by Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(c) The rate or dollar amount of taxes levied in excess of the 1-percent limitation to pay for voter-approved indebtedness incurred before July 1, 1978, or bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property approved by two-thirds of the voters on or after June 4, 1986.

(d) The amount of any special taxes and special assessments levied.

(e) The amount of any tax rate reduction pursuant to Section 96.8, with the notation: “Tax reduction by (name of jurisdiction).”

(f) The amount of any exemptions. Exemptions reimbursable by the state shall be shown separately.

(g) The total taxes due and payable on the property covered by the bill.

(h) Instructions on tendering payment, including the name and mailing address of the tax collector.

(i) The billing of any special purpose parcel tax as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 53087.4 of the Government Code, or any successor to that paragraph.

(j) Information specifying all of the following:

(1) That if the taxpayer disagrees with the assessed value as shown on the tax bill, the taxpayer has the right to an informal assessment review by contacting the assessor’s office.

(2) That if the taxpayer and the assessor are unable to agree on a proper assessed value pursuant to an informal assessment review, the taxpayer has the right to file an application for reduction in assessment for the following year with the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board, as applicable, and the time period during which the application will be accepted.

(3) The address of the clerk of the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board, as applicable, at which forms for an application for reduction in assessment may be obtained.

(4) That if an informal or formal assessment review is requested, relief from penalties shall apply only to the difference between the county assessor’s final determination of value and the value on the assessment roll for the fiscal year covered.

(k) (1) If a school district in that county provides for an exemption for a qualified special tax pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 50079 of the Government
 Code and contracts or enters into an agreement with the county to collect the qualified special tax within the district, information indicating that school district parcel tax exemption information is available on the tax collector’s Internet Web site, including the URL of the tax collector’s Internet Web site homepage.

(2) This subdivision shall only apply when the school district provides the information to the tax collector required by subdivision (e) of Section 50079 of the Government Code at least 90 days prior to the mailing or electronic transmittal of the county tax bill for that fiscal year. The tax collector shall not include on the county tax bill any
 hyperlink to a location on a school district Internet Web site that is invalid.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 391, Sec. 4.   (AB 2458)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.7.

(a) Upon the written request of a taxpayer made no later than September 1, a tax collector who has adopted this section pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) shall, subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), issue a consolidated tax statement, for all of the properties entered on the secured roll with respect to which the requesting taxpayer is the assessee. An adopting tax collector shall annually print on the back of each property tax bill a written notice to each taxpayer of a taxpayer’s authority under this section to request a
 consolidated tax statement, and of those fees, requirements, conditions, and limitations specified in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Any request made pursuant to this section for a consolidated tax statement is subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The request shall specify the assessor’s parcel number of each property on the secured roll for which the requesting taxpayer is the assessee.

(2) With respect to any single parcel, only one named assessee may request and receive a consolidated tax statement.

(3) Any request that is timely made pursuant to this section for a consolidated tax statement is valid only for those property taxes levied for the first five fiscal years following the making of the request.

(c) (1) The tax collector may charge a fee for each request for a consolidated tax statement made pursuant to this section. Any fee charged pursuant to this paragraph shall be set at an amount not greater than that amount that will allow the tax collector to recover his or her costs incurred in implementing this section.

(2) A consolidated tax statement issued pursuant to a request made pursuant to this section is not a tax bill and does not supersede or take the place of any tax bill.

(3) No tax collector shall incur any legal liability with respect to any consolidated tax statement provided by the tax collector pursuant to this section.

(4) This section does not apply to a county unless the tax collector of that county has adopted
 this section pursuant to a written memorandum transmitted to the county board of supervisors and recorded with the county recorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 137.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2612.

On the tax bill for tax-defaulted property shall appear in writing the fact that prior year taxes are in default. The tax bill may contain language such as “prior year taxes delinquent,” “prior year taxes in default,” “unpaid prior year taxes jeopardize property,” or any other language which would indicate the fact that the property is in jeopardy as a result of delinquent prior year taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 6.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2612.5.

The tax collector shall issue separate tax bills for tax-defaulted property and property which is not tax delinquent.

Where tax-defaulted property and property which is not tax delinquent have been included or combined in one assessment, the tax collector may request the assessor to make a separate valuation of each such property, and the assessor shall within 10 days from and after the date of any such request make each such valuation and notify the auditor thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 7.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2612.6.

The auditor shall enter the descriptions and the separate valuations on the roll in lieu of the original assessment, shall compute the taxes and penalties thereon and notify the tax collector thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 850.)
-------------------------------------------

2613.

All taxes shall be paid at the tax collector’s office unless the board of supervisors, upon recommendation of the tax collector and on or before the day when payments may be made, orders that taxes be collected in any other or additional location, in addition to a location within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 340, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2614.

The tax collector shall mark the fact and date of payment on the roll or delinquent roll, opposite the tax to which the payment relates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 409.)
-------------------------------------------

2614.5.

The tax collector may, when approved by resolution of the board of supervisors of such county, adopt a procedure showing the fact and date of payment on machine-prepared lists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 835.)
-------------------------------------------

2615.

Whenever taxes are paid in cash or whenever a receipt is requested at the time of payment by the person paying the tax, the tax collector shall give a receipt to the person making payment, specifying each of the following:

(a) The amount paid.

(b) The fiscal year and the installment of taxes to which the payment applies. 

(c) The description of the property.

The receipt shall be issued without charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2615.5.

When the county sends a tax bill or copy thereof to any homeowner who received the homeowners’ exemption in the immediately preceding year, except where such person has transferred title in the property since the immediately preceding lien date, or to any person who has filed an exemption claim during the preceding assessment year, the tax bill or copy shall be accompanied by a notice concerning ineligibility for the homeowners’ exemption. The notice shall inform the taxpayer of the circumstances under which he becomes ineligible for the exemption, of the penalties which are applicable if he allows the exemption to continue when he is not eligible for the exemption, and of his
 duty to inform the assessor when he is no longer eligible for the exemption. Failure to receive the notice shall not excuse the taxpayer of the duty to inform the assessor of his ineligibility for the exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

2615.6.

(a) When the county sends to any person a tax bill, it shall be accompanied by a notice regarding property tax assistance and postponement for senior citizens under the Gonsalves-Deukmejian-Petris Senior Citizens Property Tax Assistance Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) of Part 10.5 of Division 2) and the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Law (Chapter 2
 (commencing with Section 20581) of Part 10.5 of Division 2). The text of this notice shall be prepared by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Subdivision (a) is inoperative for any lien date for which funding for the Gonsalves-Deukmejian-Petris Senior Citizens Property Tax Assistance Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) of Part 10.5 of Division 2), and for the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Law (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581) of Part 10.5 of Division 2), is not provided by state law. If subdivision (a) has become inoperative under this subdivision, subdivision (a) shall become operative again commencing with the first lien date for which funding for these laws is provided by state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 160.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2616.

Not less than once every 12 months and on dates approved by the auditor, the tax collector shall account to the auditor for all moneys collected during the preceding reporting period. On the same day he or she shall file with the auditor a statement under oath, showing that all money collected by him or her has been paid as required by law.

 Not less than once every 12 months and on dates approved by the auditor, the tax collector shall file with the auditor a statement under oath, showing an itemized account of all his or
 her transactions and receipts since his or her last settlement.

In counties using a mechanized management reporting system in reporting information for a uniform four-week period, the board of supervisors, by ordinance, may provide for the duties required by this section to be performed on a corresponding uniform four-week period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2617.

All taxes due November 1, if unpaid, are delinquent at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, on December 10, and thereafter a delinquent penalty of 10 percent attaches to them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 532, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

2618.

The second half of taxes on real property, if unpaid, is delinquent at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, on April 10, and thereafter a delinquent penalty of 10 percent attaches to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 532, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2619.

If December 10 or April 10 falls on Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday, the time of delinquency is at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, on the next business day. If the board of supervisors, by adoption of an ordinance or resolution, closes the county’s offices for business prior to the time of delinquency on the “next business day” or for that whole day, that day shall be considered a legal holiday for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 705, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.
